Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NEW PATHWAYS.new text end new text begin $130,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to New Pathways in Cambridge to support preemployment and job readiness programming for families with children experiencing homelessness. Money may be used to provide individualized employment preparation, resume and job application assistance, interview readiness, and connections to local employers and training programs. This programming must help parents overcome barriers to employment while working toward stable housing and self-sufficiency through case management, family education, and partnerships with community resources. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end